Massachusetts, session 194th, H671.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, are hereby amended by
inserting after section 54B of chapter 71 the following section:-
SECTION 54B1/2. UNDESIGNATED GLUCAGON RESCUE THERAPIES
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
"Diabetes care plan", a document that specifies the diabetes-related services needed by a
student at school and at school-sponsored activities and identifies the appropriate staff to provide
and supervise these services.
of 4

"Health care provider", a physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its branches,
advanced practice registered nurse who has a written agreement with a collaborating physician
who authorizes the provision of diabetes care, or a physician assistant who has a written
supervision agreement with a supervising physician who authorizes the provision of diabetes
care.
"Principal", the principal of the school.
"School", any primary or secondary public school located in the Commonwealth.
"School personnel", a person who is employed by a public school district, a person who
is employed by a local health department and assigned to a school, or a person who contracts
with a school or school district to perform services in connection with a student's diabetes care
plan.
"Ready-to-use undesignated glucagon rescue therapy", a glucagon rescue therapy
approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration that does not require reconstitution for the
treatment of severe hypoglycemia in a dosage form that can be rapidly administered to the
patient in an emergency.
(b) A school district shall obtain a standing order of ready-to-use undesignated glucagon
rescue therapy in which a licensed health care provider with the authority to prescribe ready-to-
use glucagon rescue therapy may prescribe ready-to-use glucagon rescue therapy in the name of
the school district or school to be maintained for use when necessary. Ready-to-use undesignated
glucagon rescue therapy prescriptions must be accompanied by a standing order for the
administration of school supplied, ready-to-use undesignated glucagon rescue therapy for
potentially severe hypoglycemic reactions.
of 4

(c) A school may maintain a supply of a ready-to-use undesignated glucagon rescue
therapy in any secure location that is immediately accessible to school personnel. Any supply of
ready-to-use undesignated glucagon rescue therapies must be maintained in accordance with the
manufacturer's instructions. School personnel may administer a ready-to-use undesignated
glucagon rescue therapy that does not require reconstitution if the student's prescribed glucagon
is not available on-site or has expired.
(d) Ready-to-use undesignated glucagon rescue therapies may be used on school
property, including the school building, playground, and school bus, as well as during field trips
or sanctioned excursions away from school property.
(e) If a student is injured or harmed due to the administration of ready-to-use
undesignated glucagon rescue therapy that a licensed health professional with prescribing
authority has prescribed and a pharmacist has dispensed to a school under this section, the
licensed health professional with prescribing authority and pharmacist may not be held
responsible for the injury unless he or she issued the prescription with a conscious disregard for
safety.
(f) In the event school personnel administers ready-to-use undesignated glucagon rescue
therapy to a student who the nurse in good faith believes to be experiencing a severe
hypoglycemic reaction and administers the medication in accordance with the written policies of
the school district, then the school personnel, the school district or school of employment, and
the members of the governing board and chief administrator thereof are not liable in any criminal
action or for civil damages in their individual, marital, governmental, corporate, or other capacity
as a result of providing the glucagon.
of 4

(g) Immediately after the administration of undesignated glucagon, a school must call
911 for emergency assistance and notify the school nurse, unless the school nurse was the one
administering the undesignated glucagon, and the student's parent or guardian or emergency
contact, if known, and health care provider of its use.
of 4